Utah statutes.
59-1-1001.   Statement of taxpayer rights.
(1)  The commission shall prepare written information in clear, nontechnical
language of the taxpayer's rights and obligations and of the commission's
procedures for appeal, refund claims, and collections.
(2)  When the commission contacts a taxpayer in writing about the
determination or collection of any tax, the commission shall notify the
taxpayer of the availability of a written statement of the taxpayer's rights
and obligations and of the commission's procedures for appeal, refund claims,
and collections.  If a taxpayer requests this information, the commission
shall provide it to the taxpayer free of charge.
(3)  In notices to taxpayers of taxes and penalties due, the commission shall
notify the taxpayer of the procedure to follow in order to request detailed
information concerning the additional taxes, tax penalties, or interest.
